District of Columbia statutes.
49-806

Naval battalion not affected.

Nothing contained in this subtitle shall be held to alter the status or organization of the naval battalion as now provided for by law.

History

Mar. 1, 1889, 25 Stat. 781, ch. 328
as added Feb. 18, 1909, 35 Stat. 636, ch. 146, § 75

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 39-906.
1973 Ed., § 39-906.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2 of National Guard Tuition Assistance Clarification Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-387, May 5, 2010, 57 DCR 4325).

Editor's Notes

The reference to “this subtitle” in this section includes all sections of Subtitle I of Title 49 except §§ 49-217, 49-303, and 49-906.